test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aeaeppal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ääppal contract stem koillinen: # Noun - full paradigm
     ääppal+N+Sg+Nom: ääppal
     ääppal+N+Sg+Gen: äppal
     ääppal+N+Sg+Acc: äppal
     ääppal+N+Sg+Ill: äppla
     ääppal+N+Sg+Loc: äpplest
     ääppal+N+Sg+Com: äpplin
     ääppal+N+Ess: äpplen
     ääppal+N+Par: äppled
     ääppal+N+Sg+Abe: [äppaltaa, äppaltää]
     ääppal+N+Pl+Nom: äppal
     ääppal+N+Pl+Gen: äppli
     ääppal+N+Pl+Acc: äpplid
     ääppal+N+Pl+Ill: äpplid
     ääppal+N+Pl+Loc: äpplin
     ääppal+N+Pl+Com: äpplivuiʹm
     ääppal+N+Pl+Abe: [äpplitaa, äpplitää]
     
